apertium-br-fr.br.dix
    <pardef n="st/ekiñ__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ekiñ</l><r>ekiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oket</l><r>ekiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>okan</l><r>ekiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>okez</l><r>ekiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ok</l><r>ekiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>okomp</l><r>ekiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>okit</l><r>ekiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>okont</l><r>ekiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oker</l><r>ekiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oken</l><r>ekiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>okes</l><r>ekiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oke</l><r>ekiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>okemp</l><r>ekiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>okec’h</l><r>ekiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>okent</l><r>ekiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oked</l><r>ekiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>okis</l><r>ekiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>okjout</l><r>ekiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>okas</l><r>ekiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>okjomp</l><r>ekiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>okjoc’h</l><r>ekiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>okjont</l><r>ekiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>okjod</l><r>ekiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>okin</l><r>ekiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oki</l><r>ekiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oko</l><r>ekiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>okimp</l><r>ekiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>okot</l><r>ekiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>okoc’h</l><r>ekiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>okint</l><r>ekiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>okor</l><r>ekiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>okfen</l><r>ekiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>okfes</l><r>ekiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>okfe</l><r>ekiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>okfemp</l><r>ekiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>okfec’h</l><r>ekiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>okfent</l><r>ekiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>okfed</l><r>ekiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>okjen</l><r>ekiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>okjes</l><r>ekiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>okje</l><r>ekiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>okjemp</l><r>ekiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>okjec’h</l><r>ekiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>okjent</l><r>ekiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>okjed</l><r>ekiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ok</l><r>ekiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oket</l><r>ekiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>okomp</l><r>ekiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>okit</l><r>ekiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>okent</l><r>ekiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="stekiñ"><i>st</i><par n="st/ekiñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="adstekiñ"><i>adst</i><par n="st/ekiñ__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="distekiñ"><par n="initial-d"/><i>ist</i><par n="st/ekiñ__vblex"/></e>
